Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 9. Dissolution.
Sec. 10.06.660.
Powers and duties of directors and others in dissolution proceedings.

The powers and duties of the directors or other persons appointed by the court under AS

10.06.648

and officers after commencement of a dissolution proceeding include, but are not limited to, the following acts in the name and on behalf of the corporation:

to elect officers and to employ agents and attorneys to liquidate or wind up the affairs of the corporation;

to continue the conduct of the business insofar as necessary for the disposal or winding up of the business;

to carry out contracts and collect, pay, compromise, and settle debts and claims for or against the corporation;

to defend suits brought against the corporation;

to sue, in the name of the corporation, for sums due or owing to the corporation or to recover property of the corporation;

to collect amounts remaining unpaid on subscriptions to shares or to recover unlawful distributions;

to sell at public or private sale, exchange, convey, or otherwise dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation for cash in an amount considered reasonable by the board with or without compliance with the provisions of AS

10.06.568

and

10.06.570

and without dissenters’ rights (AS

10.06.574

—

10.06.582

) and upon terms, conditions, and other considerations the board considers reasonable or expedient;

to execute bills of sale and deeds of conveyance in the name of the corporation;

in general to make contracts and to do any and all things in the name of the corporation that may be proper or convenient for the purposes of winding up, settling, and liquidating the affairs of the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.663.
Proceeding to determine identity of directors or to appoint directors.

If the identity of a director or the right of a director to hold office is in doubt, if a director is dead or unable to act, if a director fails or refuses to act, or if the director’s whereabouts cannot be ascertained, an interested person may petition the superior court to determine the identity of the director or, if there are no directors, to appoint directors to wind up the affairs of the corporation, after hearing upon such notice as the court may direct.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.665.
Distribution of corporate assets among shareholders or other persons; when to be made.

After determining that all of the known debts and liabilities of a corporation in the process of winding up have been paid or adequately provided for, the board shall distribute all the remaining corporate assets among the shareholders according to their respective rights and preferences or, if there are no shareholders, to the persons entitled to the assets. If the winding up is by court proceeding or subject to court supervision, the distribution may not be made until after the expiration of any period for the presentation of claims that has been prescribed by order of the court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.668.
Provision for payment of debt or liability.

The payment of a debt or liability, whether the whereabouts of the creditor is known or unknown, has been adequately provided for if

payment of the debt or liability has been assumed or guaranteed in good faith by one or more financially responsible corporations or other persons or by the United States government or an agency of the United States, and the provision was determined in good faith and with reasonable care by the board to be adequate at the time of distribution of the assets by the board under AS

10.06.605

—

10.06.678

; or

the amount of the debt or liability has been deposited as provided in AS

10.06.653

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.670.
Distribution in money, property, or securities; installments.

Distribution of assets may be made in money, in property, or in securities and either in installments or as a whole, if the distribution is done fairly and ratably and in conformity with the articles of incorporation and the rights of the shareholders, and shall be made as soon as reasonably consistent with the beneficial liquidation of the corporate assets.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.673.
Plan of distribution; adoption; binding effect; notice; payment to dissenting shareholders; abandonment.

If a corporation in the process of winding up has both preferred and common shares outstanding, a plan of distribution of the shares, obligations, or securities of another corporation, or of the assets of the corporation, other than money, that is not in accordance with the liquidation rights of the preferred shares as specified in the articles of incorporation may be adopted if approved by the board and by approval of the outstanding shares of each class. The plan may provide that the distribution is in complete or partial satisfaction of the rights of the preferred shareholders upon distribution and liquidation of the assets.

A plan of distribution approved under (a) of this section is binding upon the shareholders except as provided in (c) of this section. The board shall mail notice of the adoption of the plan within 20 days after its adoption to all holders of shares having a liquidation preference.

Shareholders having a liquidation preference who dissent from the plan of distribution are entitled to be paid the amount of their liquidation preference in cash if they file written demand for payment with the corporation within 30 days after the date of mailing of the notice of the adoption of the plan of distribution unless the plan of distribution is abandoned. The demand shall state the number and class of the shares held of record by the shareholder for which the shareholder claims payment.

If a demand for cash payment is filed under (c) of this section, the board in its discretion may abandon the plan without further approval by the outstanding shares and the shareholders shall be entitled to distribution according to their rights and liquidation preferences in the process of winding up.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.675.
Recovery of amounts improperly distributed.

If a distribution of assets has been made in the process of winding up a corporation without a court order and without prior payment or adequate provision for payment of the debts and liabilities of the corporation, the amount improperly distributed to a shareholder may be recovered by the corporation. Shareholders who received an improper distribution may be joined as a party in the same action.

Suit may be brought in the name of the corporation to enforce the liability under (a) of this section against a shareholder receiving an improper distribution by a creditor of the corporation, whether or not the creditor has reduced the claim of the creditor to judgment.

A shareholder who satisfies a liability under this section has the right of ratable contribution from other distributees who are similarly liable. A shareholder who has been compelled to return to the corporation more than the shareholder’s ratable share of the amount needed to pay the debts and liabilities of the corporation may require that the corporation recover from any or all of the other distributees the proportion of the amounts received by them by the improper distribution necessary to give contribution to shareholders held liable under this section and to make the distribution of the assets fair and ratable, according to the respective rights and preferences of the shares, after payment or adequate provision for payment of all the debts and liabilities of the corporation.

In this section, “process of winding up” includes proceedings under AS

10.06.605

—

10.06.678

and other distributions of assets to shareholders made in contemplation of termination or abandonment of the corporate business.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 20, see sec. 30, ch. 166, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.06.678.
Continued existence of dissolved corporations; purposes; abatement or commencement of actions; distribution of omitted assets.

A corporation that is dissolved voluntarily or involuntarily continues to exist for the purpose of winding up its affairs, defending actions against it, and enabling it to collect and discharge obligations, dispose of and convey its property, and collect and divide its assets. A dissolved corporation does not continue to exist for the purpose of continuing business except so far as necessary for winding up the business.

An action or proceeding to which a corporation is a party does not abate by the dissolution of the corporation or by reason of proceedings for winding up and dissolution of the corporation. A corporation that is dissolved voluntarily or involuntarily may not commence a court action, except for a court action under AS

10.06.675

.

Assets inadvertently or otherwise omitted from the winding up continue as assets of the dissolved corporation for the benefit of persons entitled to the assets upon dissolution of the corporation and on realization the assets shall be distributed to the persons entitled.

The directors of the corporation on the date of its dissolution or as determined under AS

10.06.663

shall exercise and enjoy the powers necessary to act under the terms of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)